Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202621-1702
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Credit Union Act, the definitions found in sections 21-1702.01 to 21-1722 shall be used.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 62.